apertium-cy-en/apertium-cy-en.cy.dix.xml
    <pardef n="cyniw/air__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>air</l>
          <r>air<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eiria</l>
          <r>air<s n="vblex"/><s n="impv"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eiried</l>
          <r>air<s n="vblex"/><s n="impv"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eiriwn</l>
          <r>air<s n="vblex"/><s n="impv"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eiriwch</l>
          <r>air<s n="vblex"/><s n="impv"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eirient</l>
          <r>air<s n="vblex"/><s n="impv"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eirier</l>
          <r>air<s n="vblex"/><s n="impv"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eiriwn</l>
          <r>air<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eirit</l>
          <r>air<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eiriai</l>
          <r>air<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eiriem</l>
          <r>air<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eiriech</l>
          <r>air<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eirient</l>
          <r>air<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eirid</l>
          <r>air<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eiriais</l>
          <r>air<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eiriaist</l>
          <r>air<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eiriodd</l>
          <r>air<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eiriasom</l>
          <r>air<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eiriasoch</l>
          <r>air<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eiriasant</l>
          <r>air<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eiriwyd</l>
          <r>air<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eiriaswn</l>
          <r>air<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eiriasit</l>
          <r>air<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eiriasai</l>
          <r>air<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eiriasem</l>
          <r>air<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eiriasech</l>
          <r>air<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eiriasent</l>
          <r>air<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eiriasid</l>
          <r>air<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eiriaf</l>
          <r>air<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eiri</l>
          <r>air<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eiria</l>
          <r>air<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eiriwn</l>
          <r>air<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eiriwch</l>
          <r>air<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eiriant</l>
          <r>air<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eirir</l>
          <r>air<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eiriwyf</l>
          <r>air<s n="vblex"/><s n="sjnc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eiriech</l>
          <r>air<s n="vblex"/><s n="sjnc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eirio</l>
          <r>air<s n="vblex"/><s n="sjnc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eiriom</l>
          <r>air<s n="vblex"/><s n="sjnc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eirioch</l>
          <r>air<s n="vblex"/><s n="sjnc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eiriont</l>
          <r>air<s n="vblex"/><s n="sjnc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eirier</l>
          <r>air<s n="vblex"/><s n="sjnc"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="cyniwair"><par n="initial-c"/><i>yniw</i><par n="cyniw/air__vblex"/></e>
